District of Columbia statutes.
2-1831.15

Conflicts of regulations.

Unless a federal law or regulation or District of Columbia statute requires that a particular federal or District of Columbia procedure be observed, this chapter and the rules promulgated pursuant to this chapter shall take precedence in the event of a conflict with other authority with regard to any issue involving or relating to procedures of the Office.

Mar. 6, 2002, D.C. Law 14-76, § 18, 48 DCR 11442